Maryland, session 2025, SB0123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
8–724.
(a) (1) (I) THE OPERATOR OF A VESSEL INVOLVED IN A COLLISION,
ACCIDENT, OR OTHER CASUALTY THAT RESULTS IN BODILY INJURY TO ANOTHER
PERSON IMMEDIATELY SHALL STOP THE VESSEL AS CLOSE AS POSSIBLE TO THE
SCENE OF THE COLLISION, ACCIDENT, OR OTHER CASUALTY TO COMPLY WITH
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THE OPERATOR OF A VESSEL INVOLVED IN A COLLISION,
ACCIDENT, OR OTHER CASUALTY THAT RESULTS IN BODILY INJURY TO ANOTHER
PERSON IMMEDIATELY SHALL RETURN TO AND REMAIN AT THE SCENE OF THE
COLLISION, ACCIDENT, OR OTHER CASUALTY UNTIL THE OPERATOR HAS COMPLIED
WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) THE OPERATOR OF A VESSEL INVOLVED IN A COLLISION,
ACCIDENT, OR OTHER CASUALTY THAT RESULTS IN THE DEATH OF ANOTHER
PERSON IMMEDIATELY SHALL STOP THE VESSEL AS CLOSE AS POSSIBLE TO THE
– 1 –

Ch. 275 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SCENE OF THE COLLISION, ACCIDENT, OR OTHER CASUALTY TO COMPLY WITH
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THE OPERATOR OF A VESSEL INVOLVED IN A COLLISION,
ACCIDENT, OR OTHER CASUALTY THAT RESULTS IN THE DEATH OF ANOTHER
PERSON IMMEDIATELY SHALL RETURN TO AND REMAIN AT THE SCENE OF THE
COLLISION, ACCIDENT, OR OTHER CASUALTY UNTIL THE OPERATOR HAS COMPLIED
WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “SERIOUS BODILY INJURY” MEANS AN
INJURY THAT:
1. CREATES A SUBSTANTIAL RISK OF DEATH;
2. CAUSES SERIOUS PERMANENT OR SERIOUS
PROTRACTED DISFIGUREMENT;
3. CAUSES SERIOUS PERMANENT OR SERIOUS
PROTRACTED LOSS OF THE FUNCTION OF ANY BODY PART, ORGAN, OR MENTAL
FACULTY; OR
4. CAUSES SERIOUS PERMANENT OR SERIOUS
PROTRACTED IMPAIRMENT OF THE FUNCTION OF ANY BODY PART OR ORGAN.
(II) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, A PERSON CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT
TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $3,000 OR
BOTH.
2. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, A PERSON CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT
TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR
BOTH.
(III) 1. A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION AND
WHO KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN THAT THE COLLISION,
ACCIDENT, OR OTHER CASUALTY MIGHT RESULT IN SERIOUS BODILY INJURY TO
ANOTHER PERSON AND SERIOUS BODILY INJURY ACTUALLY OCCURRED TO
ANOTHER PERSON IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR
BOTH.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 275
2. A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION AND
WHO KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN THAT THE COLLISION,
ACCIDENT, OR OTHER CASUALTY MIGHT RESULT IN THE DEATH OF ANOTHER
PERSON AND DEATH ACTUALLY OCCURRED TO ANOTHER PERSON IS GUILTY OF A
FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10
YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 OR BOTH.
(B) (1) The operator of a vessel involved in a collision, accident, or other
casualty shall [render]:
(I) RENDER all practical and necessary assistance to persons
affected by the collision, accident, or casualty to save the persons from danger caused by
the collision, accident, or casualty, to the extent the operator can do so without serious
danger to the operator’s own vessel, or persons aboard[. The operator also shall give]; AND
(II) GIVE the operator’s name, address, and the identification of the
operator’s vessel to any person injured and to the owner of any property damaged.
(2) The duties imposed by this subsection are in addition to any duties
otherwise imposed by law.
(3) A PERSON CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 2 MONTHS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR BOTH.
[(b)] (C) If an accident involves any vessel subject to this subtitle while on the
waters of the State and results in the death, disappearance, or injury of any person or in
property damage of $2,000 or more, or there is complete loss of the vessel, the operator shall
file with the Department a full description of the accident, including any information the
Department requires by regulation. If the operator is unable to file the report, the vessel
owner shall file the report. If the accident caused the death or disappearance of any person
or a person receives medical treatment beyond first aid, the report shall be made within 48
hours. Any other accident resulting in personal injury or property damage shall be reported
within 10 days. This subsection does not apply to a vessel required to have a certificate of
inspection under Chapter 1, Title 46, Code of Federal Regulations.
[(c)] (D) If any vessel numbered in the State is involved in an accident on waters
outside of the State, and the accident results in the death, disappearance, or injury of any
person or in property damage of $2,000 or more, the operator or owner, within 30 days,
shall file a complete report with the Department including any information the Department
requires by regulation. This subsection does not exempt or excuse any operator or owner
from the requirements of any federal or other state law or rule or regulation having
jurisdiction over the waters in which the accident occurs. Furthermore, any
accident–reporting requirement in the federal or other state law or rule or regulation may
– 3 –

Ch. 275 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
not exonerate or excuse any failure of the operator or owner of a vessel numbered in the
State to report the accident in the State.
[(d)] (E) The required report of a boating accident may not be referred to during
any judicial proceeding. It is not subject to subpoena or admissible as evidence in any
proceeding. Subject to these restrictions, information contained in a boating accident report
and any statistical information based on the report is available on request for official
purposes to the U.S. Coast Guard and its successor agency.
[(e)] (F) Any person who complies with subsection [(a)] (B) of this section or who
gratuitously and in good faith renders or attempts to render assistance to any vessel in
distress on any waters of the State without objection from any person assisted, is not liable
for any civil damage as the result of any act or omission by the person in rendering
assistance, if the act or omission does not amount to gross negligence.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 4 –